Massachusetts, session 194th, S1181.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 76.  (a) There shall be a permanent commission on reparations. The commission 
shall consist of 15 members appointed as follows: 7 members shall be appointed by the governor, 
including 1 person from an academic field with expertise in reparatory justice and sovereignty; 1 
expert from the field of social science with expertise in economics, policy, law, and the societal 
impacts on health outcomes, life expectancy, safety, enfranchisement, well-being, freedom of 
movement, and the ability to thrive; 2 representatives of major civil society and reparations 
organizations that have historically championed the cause of reparatory justice; and 3 persons 
with respected track records in grassroots organizing. 

of 7 11  Three members shall be appointed by the senate president, including 1 economist with 
expertise in quantitative analysis to estimate costs, economic implications, and methods to 
disperse reparations, and 2 individuals from the fields of history, economics, or social science 
with expertise related to reparations. Three members shall be appointed by the speaker of the 
house of representatives, including 1 historian with expertise in the historical impacts of race-
based injustice, and 2 individuals with expertise in related fields, such as licensed clinical social 
workers specializing in collective and individual trauma. 
One member shall be appointed by the attorney general, who shall work within the civil 
rights division of the office of the attorney general. One member shall be appointed jointly by the 
house and senate chairs of the joint committee on racial equity, civil rights, and inclusion, 
selected from individuals with relevant expertise in the psychological and emotional impacts of 
race-based injustice. 
Subject area experts appointed to the commission shall include, for example, economists, 
experts on housing, legal experts, community development experts, education experts, social 
justice experts, and public health experts. 
Not more than 4 members of the commission shall be members of the legislature. 
Members shall be drawn from diverse backgrounds to represent the interests of residents of 
African descent and shall have experience working to implement restorative justice reform and, 
to the extent possible, represent geographically diverse areas of the commonwealth. 
The commission shall elect from among its members a chair, vice chair and other officers 
it considers necessary. 

of 7 32  (b) Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall not affect the powers of the 
commission and shall be filled by the original appointing authority for the balance of the 
unexpired term. 
(c) Eight members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. 
(d) The commission may establish a reasonable per diem compensation, subject to 
appropriation, for its members for attendance at not more than 10 meetings; provided, however, 
that non-legislative members shall also be entitled to compensation, subject to appropriation, for 
research and labor. The members of the commission shall be reimbursed for any usual and 
customary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. 
(e) The commission shall be a resource to the commonwealth on the subject of 
reparations. It shall be a primary function of the commission to study and recommend reparative 
actions for slavery, its consequences and continued vestiges on residents of African descent, 
including, but not limited to: (i) the institution of slavery, including both the transatlantic and 
domestic trade that existed from 1565 in colonial Florida and from 1619 to 1865, inclusive, 
within the other colonies that became the United States; (ii) the de jure and de facto 
discrimination against residents of African descent and their descendants from the end of the 
Civil War to the present, including economic, political, educational and social discrimination; 
(iii) the lingering negative effects of the institution of slavery and discrimination against people 
of African descent; (iv) the manner in which instructional resources and technologies are being 
used to deny the inhumanity of slavery and the crime against humanity committed against people 
of African descent; (v) any individuals or individual businesses, corporations or any other 
commercial or ecumenical entity in the commonwealth which facilitated or participated in the 

of 7 54 chattel slavery process by financing, owning, propagating, investing in or in any other manner 
facilitating or benefiting from slavery; and (vi) the direct benefits to societal institutions, public 
and private, including higher education, corporate, religious and associational, whether for profit 
or non-profit organizations, that have benefitted in sustaining exploitative relationships with 
residents of African descent. In performing this function, the commission shall be explicit and 
intentional in resourcing oral histories and community-based knowledge to inform the scope and 
direction of the commission work. 
(f) Furthermore, the commission shall (i) recommend and implement appropriate ways to 
educate the public of the commission’s findings; (ii) recommend appropriate remedies in 
consideration of the commission’s findings and a dedicated deliberation process to distinguish 
between and identify individual and group benefits and any policy remedies proposed; (iii) 
recommend reparation proposals for residents of African descent, with special consideration for 
African Americans who are descendants of persons enslaved in the United States; and (iv) seek 
the assistance of agencies of the commonwealth to develop and evaluate processes and 
applications for reparations, requiring the Governor to include in the annual budget bill such 
sums as necessary to carry out the Act. 
In making recommendations under this subsection, the commission shall address, among 
other issues: (A) how the recommendations comport with international standards of remedy for 
wrongs and injuries caused by the state, including full reparations and special measures, as 
understood by various relevant international protocols, laws and findings; (B) how the 
commonwealth will offer a formal apology on behalf of the people of the commonwealth for the 
perpetration of gross human rights violations and crimes against humanity on African 
Americans, freedmen and freedwomen and their descendants; (C) how laws and policies of the 

of 7 77 commonwealth that continue to disproportionately and negatively affect African Americans, 
freedmen and freedwomen and their descendants as a group and perpetuate the lingering material 
and psychosocial effects of slavery can be eliminated; (D) how the injuries resulting from 
matters described in this section can be reversed and how to provide appropriate policies, 
programs, projects and recommendations for the purpose of reversing those injuries; (E) how, in 
consideration of the commission’s findings, any form of compensation to African Americans, 
with a special consideration for African Americans who are descendants of persons enslaved in 
the United States, can be calculated; (F) what form of compensation should be awarded, through 
what instrumentalities and who should be eligible for such compensation; and (G) how, in 
consideration of the commission’s findings, any other forms of rehabilitation or restitution to 
African Americans, freedmen and freewomen and their descendants are warranted and what 
form and scope those measures should take. The commission shall submit a written report of its 
findings and recommendations to the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives not 
later than 2 years after the date of the first meeting of the commission. 
(g) The commission shall identify, compile and synthesize the relevant evidentiary 
documentation on the institution of slavery, which shall include, but not be limited to, the facts 
related to the: (i) capture and procurement of human beings in Africa; (ii) transportation of 
human beings to the United States and the colonies that became the United States for the purpose 
of enslavement, free labor, skills extraction and intellectual, sexual and cultural exploitation, 
including their treatment during transportation; (iii) sale and acquisition of residents of African 
descent as chattel property in interstate and intrastate commerce; (iv) treatment of residents of 
African descent enslaved in the colonies and the United States, including the deprivation of their 
freedom, exploitation of their labor and destruction of their culture, language, religion and 

of 7 100 families; (v) extensive denial of humanity, sexual abuse and chattelization of persons; (vi) 
101 federal and state laws that produced loss of sovereignty and discriminated against formerly 
102 enslaved residents of African descent and their descendants who were deemed United States 
103 citizens from 1868 to the present; (vii) other forms of discrimination in the public and private 
104 sectors against residents of African descent and their descendants who were deemed United 
105 States citizens from 1868 to the present, including, but not limited to, redlining, educational 
106 funding discrepancies and predatory financial practices; and (viii) lingering negative effects of 
107 the institution of slavery and the matters described in this section on living African Americans 
108 who are descendants of persons enslaved in the United and society as a whole in the United 
109 States. (h) The commission shall have the power to: (i) hold hearings at any time and location in 
110 the commonwealth and request the attendance and testimony of witnesses at said hearings; (ii) 
111 request the production of books, records, correspondence, memoranda, papers and documents; 
112 (iv) research methods and materials for facilitating education, community dialogue, symbolic 
113 acknowledgment and other formal actions leading toward repair and a sense of justice among the 
114 people of the commonwealth; (v) recommend appropriate ways to educate the public about the 
115 findings and recommendations in the commission’s report; (vi) consider such other matters 
116 relating to the institution and legacies of slavery in the commonwealth as the members of the 
117 commission deem appropriate; (vii) provide lineage-based research and tools to residents of the 
118 commonwealth who are descendants of chattel slavery within the United States; and (viii) seek 
119 an order from a superior court compelling testimony or compliance with a subpoena. 
120  (i) The commission may delegate to any subcommittee or member of the commission any 
121 action, which the commission is authorized to do or make. 

of 7 122  (j) The commission may request from all state agencies such information and assistance 
123 as the commission may require. Each state agency shall cooperate with requests from the 
124 commission and shall provide such information and assistance requested, as permitted by law. 
125 The commission shall keep confidential any information received from a state agency that is 
126 confidential or not considered a public record under clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 
127 4 of the General Laws and chapter 66 of the General Laws. 
128  (k) In furtherance of the responsibilities established under this section, the commission 
129 may: (i) appoint and fix the compensation of such personnel as the commission considers 
130 appropriate; (ii) procure supplies, services and property by contract in accordance with 
131 applicable laws and rules; and (iii) enter into contracts for the purposes of conducting research or 
132 surveys, preparing reports and performing other activities necessary for the discharge of the 
133 duties of the commission with federal or state departments, agencies and other instrumentalities 
134 and private entities. 
135  (l) Any reparation actions undertaken pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any 
136 reparation actions taken at the federal or local level. 
137  SECTION 2. The first meeting of the commission shall occur not later than 90 days after 
138 the effective date of this act.